Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 189 Traffic Regulations — Vehicle Equipment and Storage
189.125.
Requirements of use of seat belts, child restraint systems, and child booster seats — Exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, “motor vehicle” as used in this section means every vehicle designed to carry fifteen (15) or fewer passengers and used for the transportation of persons, but the term does not include:

Motorcycles;

Motor-driven cycles; or

Farm trucks registered for agricultural use only and having a gross weight of one (1) ton or more.

A person shall not sell any new motor vehicle in this state nor shall any person make application for registering a new motor vehicle in this state unless the front or forward seat or seats have adequate anchors or attachments secured to the floor and/or sides to the rear of the seat or seats to which seat belts may be secured.

Any driver of a motor vehicle, when transporting a child of forty (40) inches in height or less in a motor vehicle operated on the roadways, streets, and highways of this state, shall have the child properly secured in a child restraint system of a type meeting federal motor vehicle safety standards.

Any driver of a motor vehicle, when transporting a child under the age of eight (8) years who is between forty (40) inches and fifty-seven (57) inches in height in a motor vehicle operated on the roadways, streets, and highways of this state, shall have the child properly secured in a child booster seat. A child of any age who is greater than fifty-seven (57) inches in height shall not be required to be secured in a child booster seat under this section.

As used in this section:

“Child restraint system” means any device manufactured to transport children in a motor vehicle which conforms to all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards; and

“Child booster seat” means a child passenger restraint system that meets the standards set forth in 49 C.F.R. Part 571 that is designed to elevate a child to properly sit in a federally approved lap-and-shoulder belt system.

Failure to use a child passenger restraint system or a child booster seat shall not be considered as contributory negligence, nor shall such failure to use a passenger restraint system or booster seat be admissible as evidence in the trial of any civil action. Failure of any person to wear a seat belt shall not constitute negligence per se.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle manufactured after 1981 on the public roadways of this state unless the driver and all passengers are wearing a properly adjusted and fastened seat belt, unless the passenger is a child who is secured as required in subsection (3) of this section. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to:

A person who has in his possession at the time of the conduct in question a written statement from a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed chiropractor that he is unable, for medical or physical reasons, to wear a seat belt; or

A letter carrier of the United States postal service while engaged in the performance of his duties.

A conviction for a violation of subsection (6) of this section shall not be transmitted by the court to the Transportation Cabinet. The Transportation Cabinet shall not include a conviction for a violation of subsection (6) of this section as part of any person’s driving history record.

The provisions of subsection (6) of this section shall supersede any existing local ordinance involving the use of seat belts. No ordinance contrary to subsection (6) of this section may be enacted by any unit of local government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 76, § 1; 1982, ch. 158, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 39, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 180, § 9, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 108, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2012, ch. 130, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 91, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 87, § 4, effective July 15, 2016.

189.126.
Roadblocks for sole purpose of checking for seat belt violations prohibited.

All law enforcement agencies in this state shall be prohibited from erecting roadblocks for the sole purpose of checking for violations of KRS

189.125

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 180, § 12, effective July 12, 2006.

189.130.
Mirrors.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, every motor vehicle shall be equipped with the following mirrors so located and adjusted as to reflect to the driver a view of the highway to the rear of the vehicle:

One (1) mirror mounted on the left side of the vehicle; and

One (1) mirror mounted either inside the vehicle approximately in the center or on the right side of the vehicle.

No person shall, by himself or through his agent or servant, operate a motor vehicle upon the highways without the equipment required by subsection (1). Each day of operation without the equipment shall constitute a separate offense.

No person shall sell, barter, or otherwise dispose of any motor vehicle described in subsection (1) unless it is equipped with a mirror as provided in that subsection.

A motorcycle shall be required only to have the mirror identified a paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section.

History.

2739a-69a, 2739i-1 to 2739i-3: amend. Acts 2006, ch. 173, § 9, effective July 12, 2006.

189.140.
Mufflers — Noise regulation.

Every motor vehicle with an internal-combustion, steam or air motor shall be equipped with a suitable and efficient muffler. No person while on a highway shall operate a motor vehicle with the muffler cut out or removed. No cutout shall be so arranged or connected as to permit its operation or control by the driver of any motor vehicle while in position for driving.

No person shall modify the exhaust system of a motor vehicle or an off highway vehicle in a manner which will amplify or increase the noise emitted by the motor of such vehicle above that emitted by the muffler originally installed on the vehicle. The original muffler shall comply with all of the noise requirements of KRS Chapter 224 and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. No person shall operate a motor vehicle with an exhaust system so modified.

History.

2739g-25: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 332, § 1.

189.150.
Escaping contents — Shifting or spilling loads.

No vehicle shall be operated upon any highway unless it is so constructed as to prevent its contents from escaping.

No vehicle shall be operated upon any public highway for a distance of over one (1) mile whose load is susceptible to shifting or spillage unless said load is covered with a device suitable for prevention of spillage.

History.

2739g-49: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 203, § 14, effective July 15, 1982.

189.160.
Vehicles transporting explosives to be marked — Fire extinguishers.

Whenever a vehicle is used to transport an explosive, it shall be marked on each side and the rear with the word “Explosives” in letters no less than eight (8) inches high, or there shall be displayed on the rear of the vehicle a red flag not less than twenty-four (24) inches square marked with the word “Danger” in white letters six (6) inches high. The vehicle shall be equipped with not less than two (2) fire extinguishers, filled and ready for immediate use, and placed at a convenient point on the vehicle.

History.

2739g-69e.

189.170.
Trucks hauling stock to display owner’s name. [Repealed.]

189.180.
Height, width and length of trucks and semitrailer trucks. [Repealed.]

189.190.
Chains and lugs on wheels — Thickness of solid rubber tires.

No person shall use on a highway not covered with ice, a vehicle with a chained wheel, unless the wheel rests upon an ice shoe at least six (6) inches wide.

Where chains are used on rubber-tired vehicles, the cross chains shall be not more than three-fourths (3/4) of an inch in thickness or diameter, and shall be spaced not more than ten (10) inches apart, around the circumference of the tires.

Any machinery, utensils or implements used solely for agricultural, farming or manufacturing purposes may be operated on the highways under present equipment except as is provided in subsection (4).

No tractor, traction engine, hauling engine or other similar power vehicle having any projections on the face of the tires or rims of the wheels in contact with the pavement shall be operated on any highway, the top surface of which is either composed of or treated with bituminous materials or concrete except that the driving wheels may be fitted with flat lugs extending diagonally across the entire width of the tire or rim. Those lugs shall be not less than one (1) inch in width at the bearing surface in contact with the pavement, but those lugs shall be so spaced that not less than two (2) lugs on each driving wheel shall be in contact with the highway surface at all times. The front or nondriving wheels may be fitted with flat steering rings, if those rings are at least two (2) inches in width and not more than one and one-half (1-1/2) inches in height, but there shall be no bolt head, rivet heads or other projections beyond the face of the tire or rim. The narrow angle iron lugs used for plowing or on soft ground shall not be permitted, nor shall any tractor or other vehicles of the caterpillar or track laying type having such projections on the faces of the shoes or treads of the track in contact with the roadway be permitted unless fitted with the flat lugs, in a way that will prevent any injury to the highway by either the narrow angle lugs or the projections on any tractor or other vehicle named in this section.

No solid rubber or rubber compounded tire on any vehicle, other than a vehicle being actually used in the construction or maintenance of a highway, shall be less than one (1) inch thick, measured from the steel flange of the rim. Any person violating this subsection shall be civilly liable for any damage done to any state or county highway. The county attorney of the county in which the damage is done shall institute actions necessary to reimburse the state or county for the damage suffered.

History.

2739g-33, 4345, 4346a-1, 4346a-2, 4346a-5.

189.200.
Maximum weight on iron and solid tires.

No person shall operate on a highway a vehicle that has greater weight on any tire per inch of width of the tire which is in contact with the surface of the highway, than four hundred (400) pounds, for iron or steel tires, or six hundred (600) pounds, for solid rubber or rubber compounded tires.

History.

2739g-33.

189.205.
Regrooved or recut tires prohibited — Exceptions.

No person shall knowingly operate on any highway any vehicle on which any tire has been regrooved or recut or offer such tire for sale or exchange.

This section shall not apply to regrooved or recut vehicle tires which are designed and constructed in such a manner that regrooving and recutting is an acceptable and safe practice nor does this subsection apply to regrooving and recutting done in a tire recapping process.

No provision of this section shall apply or be construed to apply to any commercial vehicle operated under safety regulations or requirements of the Kentucky department of vehicle regulation or of the interstate commerce commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 142, § 1.

189.210.
Maximum weight permitted on highway.

No person shall operate on a highway any vehicle, object or contrivance, other than a motor truck or semitrailer truck, which weighs more than fifteen (15) tons, including the weight of the vehicle, object or contrivance and load, except as provided by subsection (2). This shall not apply to vehicles run upon tracks or fire apparatus belonging to any municipal or volunteer fire department or used by such a department in the discharge of its functions.

The county judge/executive or the county road engineer of any county upon an application in writing by the owner or person having charge of, may grant permission for the movement of vehicles, objects or structures limited by subsection (1), over the highways within that county and located outside of a city. The permission shall be in writing and the county judge/executive or the county road engineer may grant it subject to such conditions and restrictions as in his judgment are necessary for the preservation and protection of the highways. The city engineer or mayor of any city may in like manner grant permission as to the highways within the city.

History.

4345a-1, 4345a-2.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The county is not legally authorized to accept a bond for the day-to-day use of a county road by trucks weighing substantially in excess of the legal limits, and any such use constitutes a violation of law and may be cited to the district court.

OAG 78-726

.

A county judge/executive is not authorized by this section to grant permission for trucks or semitrailers to exceed the weight limit on county roads imposed by subsection (4) of KRS

189.221

on trucks, semitrailer trucks or tractor trailer units, since the express language of this section excepts motor trucks or semitrailer trucks from its operation, and since a contrary interpretation would subvert the clear intent of KRS

189.221

, which section must be considered in pari materia with this section.

OAG 81-397

.

189.212.
Authority of fiscal court to issue special permits for certain haulers.

As used in this section, “materials” shall mean cargo, whether divisible or nondivisible, that a motor vehicle transports in the usual and ordinary course of business and shall specifically include, but not be limited to, agricultural products, minerals, or natural resources transported by a motor vehicle.

A fiscal court may issue special permits to the owners, operators, or lessees of motor vehicles for the purpose of hauling materials whose gross weight or dimensions, including vehicle and load, exceeds the limits prescribed by KRS

189.210

but that do not exceed the maximum weight limits established in KRS

189.222

. A permit shall be issued for specified materials only and shall designate the portions of the fiscal court-owned road over which the vehicle may operate under the permit. The permit shall be issued for a stated period of time not to exceed one (1) year and shall be upon the terms and conditions as the fiscal court may, in its discretion, require. The fiscal court shall require, as a condition to issuing the permit, that the applicant pay a reasonable fee to be fixed by the fiscal court and enter into a cooperative agreement under the provisions of KRS

189.230

. The operation of any motor vehicle in accordance with the terms of the permit shall not constitute a violation of this chapter, if the operator has a valid permit, or a copy of a valid permit, in his or her possession.

The fiscal court shall not issue a permit under this section for a vehicle whose dimensions, including vehicle and load, exceed the maximum dimension limits established in KRS

189.222

.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle in violation of the terms and conditions of any permit issued by the fiscal court under this section.

A fiscal court may:

Exercise general supervision for administering and enforcing the provisions of this section.

Adopt ordinances regulating the issuance of a permit, including but not limited to matters concerning the duration of permits and weight limits for various types of vehicles, materials, and highways.

Adopt rules and regulations governing the amount, terms, and conditions of a bond and the sufficiency of the surety of any bond required by this section.

Issue, continue in effect, revoke, modify, or deny a permit issued under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 484, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

189.214.
Recreational vehicles — Access to public highways — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Appurtenances” means the following devices that do not extend beyond the maximum vehicle width as established in subsection (2) of this section by more than six (6) inches on either side of a recreational vehicle:

Hand holds for entry or egress;

Load-induced tire bulge;

Rearview mirrors;

Splash and spray suppressant devices;

Turn signal lamps; and

Shade awnings and their mounting hardware;

“Recreational vehicle” has the meaning set forth in KRS 186.650(4); and

“Width exclusion safety devices” means the following devices that do not extend beyond the maximum vehicle width as established in subsection (2) of this section by more than three (3) inches on either side of a recreational vehicle:

Corner caps;

Lift pads;

Rear or side door hinges and protective hardware;

Rain gutters;

Side marker lamps;

Tarps and tarp hardware; and

Wall variations from a true flat.

A recreational vehicle that is one hundred two (102) inches in width and is registered under KRS

186.050

,

186.655

, or an equivalent statute from another state shall have access to any public state-maintained highway in Kentucky and the vehicle’s appurtenances and width exclusion safety devices shall not exceed the limits defined in this section. A recreational vehicle shall not exceed established weight limits on Kentucky highways without first obtaining an overweight permit issued under this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 96, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 34, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

189.220.
Maximum weight of truck or semitrailer truck. [Repealed.]

189.221.
Basic height, width, length, and weight limits for trucks, trailers, manufactured homes, or vehicles — Exception.

A person shall not operate on any highway, except those highways designated by the secretary of transportation under the provisions of KRS

189.222

, or those locally maintained highways under the provisions of KRS

189.222

(11) or KRS 189.230(4), any of the following trucks, trailers, manufactured homes, or vehicles:

Any motor truck, semitrailer, trailer, manufactured home, or vehicle which exceeds eleven and one-half (11-1/2) feet in height or ninety-six (96) inches in width, including any part of the body or load;

Any motor truck, except a semitrailer truck, which exceeds twenty-six and one half (26-1/2) feet in length, including any part of the body or load;

Any semitrailer truck which exceeds thirty (30) feet in length, including any part of the body or load;

Any truck, semitrailer truck, or truck and trailer unit which exceeds 36,000 pounds gross weight, including the load;

Any truck, semitrailer truck, or tractor-trailer unit which exceeds a gross weight equal to the sum of six hundred (600) pounds per inch of the combined width of the tires upon which the vehicle may be propelled, but no more than thirty-six thousand (36,000) pounds.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, any truck hauling building materials under KRS

189.2226

, or to a road construction project on a highway rated less than the maximum weight provided above, may haul up to eighty thousand (80,000) pounds gross weight, including the load, without a permit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 115, § 2; 1962, ch. 91, § 2; 1982, ch. 395, § 19, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 330, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 132, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 42, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 484, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 124, §§ 35, 38, effective June 24, 2003; 2009, ch. 34, § 2, effective June 25, 2009.

189.222.
Increased height, length, and weight limits on designated highways — Exceptions — Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to implement 23 C.F.R. Part 658 — Restriction of cabinet’s enforcement powers on locally maintained roads.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet in respect to highways which are a part of the state- maintained system, by official order, may increase on designated highways or portions thereof, the maximum height, length, and gross weight prescribed in KRS

189.221

, if in the opinion of the secretary, the increased height, length, and weight designated by him are justified by the strength, safety, and durability of the designated highways, and the highways do not appear susceptible to unreasonable and unusual damage by reason of the increases and the secretary may establish reasonable classification of state maintained roads and fix a different maximum for each classification. Any increase in the height, length, or width of any motor truck or tractor semitrailer combinations or any other vehicle combinations including any part of the body or load or designation of highways to be used by the vehicles, shall not, in any way, exceed the federal law or regulations thereunder or jeopardize the allotment or qualification for federal aid funds of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or exceed the following dimensions and weights:

Height, for vehicles transporting motor vehicles, fourteen (14) feet; and

Height, for all other vehicles, thirteen and one-half (13-1/2) feet;

Length, semitrailers, fifty-three (53) feet; trailers, twenty-eight (28) feet; motor trucks, forty-five (45) feet, not to exceed two (2) trailers per truck tractor;

Weight, twenty thousand (20,000) pounds per single axle, with axles less than forty-two (42) inches apart to be considered as a single axle; thirty-four thousand (34,000) pounds on two (2) axles in tandem arrangement which are spaced forty-two (42) inches or more apart and less than ninety-six (96) inches apart; forty-eight thousand (48,000) pounds on three (3) axles which are spaced forty-two (42) inches or more apart and less than one hundred twenty (120) inches apart. No single axle in any arrangement shall exceed twenty thousand (20,000) pounds or seven hundred (700) pounds per inch of the aggregate width of all the tires on a single axle, whichever is less. The total gross weight of the vehicle and load shall not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds;

Except on the interstate highway system, a tolerance of not more than five percent (5%) per axle load shall be permitted before a carrier is deemed to have violated paragraph (c) of this subsection. The gross weight shall not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds;

Except as provided for in paragraph (f) of this subsection, truck tractor, semitrailer and trailer combinations, and other vehicle combinations may be operated only on the interstate system and on those parts of the federal aid highway system and the state-maintained system which have been designated by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet by official order as safely allowing same;

A vehicle or combination of vehicles that is one hundred two (102) inches wide or less and has a gross weight of not more than eighty thousand (80,000) pounds may be driven on any state highway, for a distance of up to fifteen (15) miles from an interstate or parkway exit.

In addition to the provisions of KRS

189.2226

, vehicles with a gross weight of up to eighty thousand (80,000) pounds may travel on any state highway in the Commonwealth without obtaining a special permit, if the weight does not exceed any limits mandated by federal law or regulation, any posted bridge weight limit, or the weight limits for the size and type of vehicle established under paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section, and if the vehicle is transporting any of the following:

Meats or agricultural crop products originating from a farm to first market;

Livestock or poultry from their point of origin to first market. As used in this paragraph and in paragraph (d) of this subsection, “livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, or any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species;

Primary forest products, including, but not limited to, sawdust, wood chips, bark, slabs, or logs originating from their points of origin to first market; or

Supplies, materials, or equipment necessary to carry out a farming operation engaged in the production of agricultural crop products, meats, livestock, or poultry.

The following vehicles registered under KRS

186.050

may exceed the gross weight provisions set forth in subsection (1)(c) of this section by a weight tolerance of ten percent (10%), except on the interstate highway system:

Vehicles that are engaged exclusively in the transportation of items listed in subsection (2)(a), (b), and (c) of this section; and

Vehicles that are engaged exclusively in the transportation of feed for livestock or poultry.

Vehicles exclusively engaged in the transportation of motor vehicles, unmanufactured tobacco, or unmanufactured tobacco products may, on those highways which are a part of the state-maintained system and which have been designated by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet by official order as safely allowing same, attain the maximum lengths as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, excluding the usual and ordinary bumper overhang of the transported vehicles.

Vehicles engaged exclusively in the transportation of farm or primary forestry products and registered under KRS 186.050(4) or 186.050(9) and vehicles engaged exclusively in the transportation of ready-mixed concrete shall be excluded from the axle weight provisions, except on interstate highways, and subject only to total gross weight provisions.

Vehicles registered pursuant to KRS 186.050(3)(b) and engaged in the transportation of primary forest products, including, but not limited to, vehicles transporting sawdust, wood chips, bark, slabs, or logs, may exceed the axle, or gross weight provisions as set forth in accordance with subsection (1)(c) of this section by a weight tolerance of ten percent (10%), except on the interstate highway system.

Vehicles designed for and engaged exclusively in the collection and hauling of refuse and registered under KRS 186.050(3)(b) shall be excluded from the axle weight provisions, except when in operation on the federal interstate system, and subject only to total gross weight provisions.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet may by order increase the weight and height limits prescribed by this chapter for motor vehicles while being operated exclusively on roads or highways being constructed, reconstructed, or repaired under contract with the Transportation Cabinet by the contractor or subcontractor, agent, or employee thereof.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall not authorize the operation of any vehicle or combination of vehicles, upon any part of the federal aid highway system or state parkway system, which exceeds the following dimensions and weights:

Width, one hundred two (102) inches, including any part of the body or load;

Weight, twenty thousand (20,000) pounds per single axle, with axles less than forty-two (42) inches apart to be considered as a single axle; thirty-four thousand (34,000) pounds on two (2) axles in tandem arrangement which are spaced forty-two (42) inches or more apart and less than ninety-six (96) inches apart; forty-eight thousand (48,000) pounds on three (3) axles which are spaced forty-two (42) inches or more apart and less than one hundred twenty (120) inches apart. The total gross weight of the vehicle and load shall not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds. If any federal law or laws or regulations thereunder are hereafter enacted authorizing weights and dimensions in excess of those set out in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet may by official order increase the maximum weights and dimensions but the increased weights and dimensions shall not exceed those set out in this section.

Except on the interstate highway system, vehicles engaged exclusively in the transportation of crushed stone, fill dirt and rock, soil, bulk sand, coal, phosphate muck, asphalt, concrete, solid waste, tankage or animal residues, livestock, feed for livestock or poultry, and agricultural products shall be permitted a tolerance of ten percent (10%) of the axle weight provisions before a carrier is deemed to have violated paragraph (1)(c) of this section.

The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, relating to the implementation of 23 C.F.R. Part 658 as it relates to state-maintained or locally maintained roads. The enforcement of the provisions of KRS

189.221

and this section on locally maintained roads shall not be the responsibility of the law enforcement officers of the Transportation Cabinet, unless the head of the corresponding local government unit has requested, in writing, enforcement assistance from the Transportation Cabinet.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 115, § 3; 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 2; 1958, ch. 70, § 29; 1960, ch. 254, § 2; 1962, ch. 108; 1964, ch. 95, § 3; 1966, ch. 261; 1972, ch. 150, § 1; 1974, ch. 368, § 1; 1980, ch. 39, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 393, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 71, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 132, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 111, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 30, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2003, ch. 124, § 36, effective June 24, 2003; 2009, ch. 34, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 8, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 129, § 10, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 146, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 175, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

189.2224.
Authority to join interstate compact for overdimensional permits.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, or his or her designee, is hereby authorized to join and negotiate with other states a compact for overdimensional permits. If the secretary joins a compact pursuant to this section, the cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A governing the administration and enforcement of a compact on overdimensional permits.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 19, § 42, effective June 24, 2015.

189.2225.
Operation of certain overdimensional motor vehicles authorized in some counties — Operation of certain overdimensional motor vehicles transporting agricultural commodities or materials authorized on all public roads.

In a county that does not have at least ten (10) miles of existing highway designated by the Transportation Cabinet for operation of motor vehicles that have a width of one hundred two (102) inches, a motor vehicle that does not exceed the length requirements set forth in KRS 189.222(1)(b) or a width of one hundred two (102) inches may be operated on the state-maintained highway segments in that county with lane widths of ten (10) or more feet if those highway segments are designated by the Transportation Cabinet as capable of accommodating an eighty thousand (80,000) pound gross weight limit. The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A that lists the counties and highway segments that meet the criteria of this subsection.

Vehicles authorized to operate on state-maintained roads pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be authorized to do so only until the Transportation Cabinet promulgates an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A that designates more than ten (10) miles of highway in a county as capable of accommodating motor vehicles with these dimensions.

A motor vehicle or combination motor vehicle transporting agricultural commodities from a farm or transporting materials needed in the production of agricultural commodities to a farm that does not exceed the length requirements set forth in KRS 189.222(1)(b) or a width of one hundred two (102) inches shall be allowed to operate on any public road in Kentucky.

The provisions of this section shall not authorize the weight limitation of any highway or bridge to be exceeded.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish reasonable safety criteria for the operation of motor vehicles pursuant to this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 162, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

189.2226.
Definitions — Vehicles hauling building materials.

As used in this section:

“Bill of lading” means a document evidencing the purchase of, or delivery order for, building materials issued by a person engaged in a business that sold or leased the building materials;

“Building materials” means equipment or materials associated with new home construction, home remodeling, or home maintenance, including but not limited to:

Agriculture products;

Asphalt;

Concrete;

Crushed stone;

Excavation equipment;

Fill dirt and rock;

Glass;

Landscaping materials;

Lumber or other wood products;

Minerals;

Roofing materials; and

Steel products;

“Home” means:

A site where a single or multi-family housing unit is being initially constructed for which a building permit for construction has been issued by the authorized local government in the city or county in which construction will take place; and

A site where construction of a single or multi-family housing unit is complete and persons inhabit the housing unit; and

“State road” means a state or federal highway but does not mean an interstate or county road.

Other statutes to the contrary in this chapter notwithstanding, any vehicle hauling building materials to a home shall be allowed, subject to the provisions of this section, to travel on any state road without a permit and without being subject to a fine, if the weight of the vehicle is within the limits of the registration issued to the vehicle and within the axle limits for the vehicle, even if the vehicle’s gross weight or length, including vehicle and load, exceed the limits prescribed by this chapter or in other aspects fail to comply with this chapter.

A vehicle hauling building materials under this section shall be allowed to travel the most direct route, in the opinion of the operator, to the vehicle’s point of destination, provided any road traveled as the most direct route shall not be further than fifteen (15) miles from a state road that is classified to carry the registered weight of the vehicle. If a vehicle is traveling a road classified by the cabinet as a single “A” highway, the vehicle or its load cannot exceed ninety-six (96) inches in width. If a vehicle or its load exceed ninety-six (96) inches in width, the operator shall be required to obtain the appropriate overdimensional permit required by this chapter to travel the proposed route. The operator of a vehicle hauling building materials under this section shall have in his or her possession a bill of lading.

All vehicles hauling building materials under this section shall be prohibited from exceeding the established width and posted bridge weight limits for any route the vehicle travels. A vehicle that exceeds the width or bridge limits for its posted routes shall be required to obtain the appropriate overdimensional or overweight permit required by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 124, § 34, effective June 24, 2003; 2022 ch. 153, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

189.223.
Measuring or weighing of vehicle by peace officer — Unloading of excess weight.

Any peace officer having reason to believe that the height, length, width or weight of any motor truck, semitrailer truck, or trailer, is in excess of the maximum limits prescribed by KRS

189.221

and subsection (1) of

189.222

or permitted by any special permit issued under KRS

189.270

and in the possession of the operator, may measure it or weigh it either by portable or stationary scales, and may require it to be driven to the nearest scales, if such scales are within a distance of five (5) miles from the point at which the vehicle is first directed to stop. If the officer shall determine that the operation of the motor truck, semitrailer, or trailer, was unlawful, he shall require the operator of said motor truck, semitrailer truck, or trailer to unload such portion of the load as may be necessary to decrease the gross weight of the vehicle to the maximum gross weight permitted under the terms of KRS

189.221

and subsection (1) of

189.222

or of KRS

189.270

, or he may, at the election of the operator, permit the operator to move the vehicle with its load to the nearest city or nearest court having jurisdiction, at which place the excess load shall be unloaded. The excess load shall be unloaded at the sole risk of the owner. The refusal of the operator to permit his motor truck, semitrailer truck, or trailer to be measured or weighed, or to proceed to a scales, or to unload the excess load, shall constitute a violation of KRS 189.221 to

189.228

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 115, § 4.

189.224.
Permitting unlawful operation of a motor vehicle prohibited.

It is unlawful for the owner, or any other person, employing or otherwise directing the operator of any vehicle, to require or knowingly to permit the operation of such vehicle upon a highway in any manner contrary to law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 115, § 5.

189.225.
Designation of National Emergency Highways, for purpose of weight and length limits. [Repealed.]

189.226.
Violations of KRS 189.221 to 189.228, what constitutes.

Every person who commits, attempts to commit, conspires to commit, or aids or abets in the commission of, any act declared by KRS

189.221

to

189.228

to be a crime, whether individually or in connection with one or more other persons or as a principal, agent, or accessory, shall be guilty of such offense, and every person who falsely, fraudulently, forcibly, or willfully induces, causes, coerces, requires, permits, assists, or directs another to violate any provision of KRS

189.221

to

189.228

is likewise guilty of such offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 115, § 6.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Notes, Economic, Social and Legal Aspects of Coal Transportation in Kentucky,
64 Ky. L.J. 601 (1975-76).

189.227.
Enforcement of KRS 189.221 to 189.228 and other statutes relating to motor vehicles — Department of Kentucky State Police powers — Commercial motor vehicle inspectors.

The Department of Highways may take such actions, and may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, as are necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of KRS

189.221

to

189.228

, including but not limited to the erection, establishment, and maintenance of permanent or portable scales.

The Department of Kentucky State Police is authorized to employ commercial motor vehicle inspectors and such other employees as may be necessary to operate any scales erected or established, and commercial motor vehicle inspectors employed under this section shall have the authority of peace officers for the purpose of enforcing KRS

189.221

to

189.228

, and other statutes relating to motor vehicles, and for no other purpose. A previous period of residence within the county of service shall not be required of any peace officer appointed under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 115, § 7; 2010, ch. 93, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Notes, Economic, Social and Legal Aspects of Coal Transportation in Kentucky,
64 Ky. L.J. 601 (1975-76).

189.228.
Evidence of ownership — Each violation constitutes separate offense.

For the purposes of KRS

189.221

to

189.228

, proof of the registration of any vehicle in the name of any person shall be prima facie evidence of ownership of said vehicle by the person in whose name it is registered, and each violation by an owner, whether or not with the same vehicle, shall constitute a separate offense by that owner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 115, § 8.